Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-448
Plan of reorganization; disapproval of plan; continuance of efforts; revised plan; approval.

If the majority vote in each voting unit at the election described in section 79-447 is not in favor of the plan of reorganization, the school districts may continue in their efforts in an attempt to prepare a revised plan which might be acceptable. If a revised plan is approved by the school districts, it shall be submitted for the approval of the state committee, and if approved by the state committee it shall be submitted to a vote under the procedure provided in section 79-447.

Laws 1963, c. 479, § 10, p. 1544;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-426.16;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 197;

Laws 1999, LB 272, § 51.